Georgia, session 2025_26, HB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Richard H. Smith Georgia CHIPS
Advancement in Research and Economic Development Act."
H. B. 216
- 1 -

LC 59 0065/AP
SECTION 2.
Chapter 7 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department
of Economic Development, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 11
50-7-130.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'commission' means the Georgia CHIPS and
Advanced Technology Commission established pursuant to this Code section.
(b) Subject to available funding, the commission shall be established for the purposes of:
(1) Establishing a forum for public and private stakeholders across the semiconductor
manufacturing industry in this state to focus on education, research and development, and
commercial production;
(2) Leveraging the expertise and capacity of institutions of higher education in this state,
industry, and nonprofit organizations focused on semiconductor and advanced technology
economic and workforce development to develop a comprehensive strategic plan to
ensure ongoing semiconductor innovation;
(3) Advising on strategies for attracting public and private investment in this state related
to research, development, commercialization, manufacturing, and advanced packaging
of semiconductors;
(4) Identifying and expanding opportunities for workforce training and development
related to the research, design, and manufacturing of semiconductors and related
advanced technologies;
(5) Sustaining the leadership of this state in advanced semiconductor research, design,
manufacturing, and advanced packaging; and
(6) Encouraging the state, counties, and municipalities to attract and support the
semiconductor industry and related suppliers.
H. B. 216
- 2 -

LC 59 0065/AP
(c) The commission shall be composed of the following members:
(1) Three members appointed by the Governor;
(2) Two members appointed by the President of the Senate;
(3) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(4) The chancellor of the University System of Georgia or his or her designee; and
(5) The commissioner of Technical College System of Georgia or his or her designee.
(d) In making appointments under subsection (c) of this Code section, priority shall be
given to individuals with experience in manufacturing, design, industrial development,
academic research, and scientific research in the field of semiconductors.
(e) All vacancies on the commission shall be filled by the original appointing official.
(f) The commission shall be assigned to the Georgia Department of Economic
Development for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.
(g) The commission shall stand abolished on June 30, 2028."
SECTION 3.
Chapter 34 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the OneGeorgia
Authority, is amended by repealing Code Section 50-34-21, relating to the Georgia CHIPS
and Advanced Technology Consortium.
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 216
- 3 -